North Carolina statutes. Chapter 110. Child Welfare.
Article 5A. Interstate Parole and Probation Hearing Procedures for Juveniles. [Repealed]

§§ 110-64.6 through 110-64.9.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 815, s. 2.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to interstate parole and probation hearing procedures for juveniles, see now G.S. 7B-2822 through 7B-2825.